Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 60.10 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In a criminal case in which the defendant is accused of an
offense involving domestic violence or abuse, evidence of the
commission of another act of domestic violence or abuse by the
defendant is admissible and may be considered for its bearing on any
matter to which it is relevant.
B. In a criminal case in which the state intends to offer
evidence under this section, the attorney for the state shall
disclose the evidence to the defendant, including statements of
Req. No. 10393 Page 1

witn esses or a summary of the substance of any testimony that is
expected to be offered, at least fifteen (15) days before the
commencement of trial or at such later time as the court may allow
for good cause.
C. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
limit the admission or consideration of evidence under any other
rule or provision of law.
D. For purposes of this section, "domestic violence or abuse"
means any incident of controlling, coercive, or threatening
behavior, violence, or other act of abuse against a current partner
or a family or household member as specified in subsection C of
Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The violence or
abuse may be psychological, physical, sexual, economic, or
emotional.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10393 CMA 12/28/24







Req. No. 10393 Page 2